Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2203.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Department of education; review of reporting requirements; recommendations; delayed repeal; definition A. The department of education shall review each requirement prescribed by the Arizona Revised Statutes for public schools in this state to report information to the department and identify whether: 1. The reporting requirement has expired or is otherwise obsolete. 2. Public schools are required to submit the same information for two or more reporting requirements. B. The department of education shall review each requirement prescribed by the Arizona Revised Statutes for the department to submit a report to the legislature and identify whether: 1. The reporting requirement has expired or is otherwise obsolete. 2. The department is required to submit the same information for two or more reporting requirements. C. On or before December 1, 2026, the department of education shall submit to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate a report that both: 1. Summarizes the reviews required pursuant to subsections A and B of this section. 2. Recommends legislative action to consolidate, eliminate or otherwise modify the reporting requirements described in subsections A and B of this section. For the purposes of this paragraph, the department shall recommend the repeal or consolidation of any reporting requirement that is duplicative, expired or otherwise obsolete. D. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2029. E. For the purposes of this section, "report to the legislature" includes any report that must be submitted to the legislature, to the speaker of the house of representatives, to the president of the senate, to a joint committee, to a committee of the house of representatives or to a committee of the senate. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.